Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.090

Loan repayment and scholarship awards.

(1) The office may grant loan repayment and scholarship awards to eligible participants from the funds appropriated to the Washington health corps program. Participants are ineligible to receive loan repayment under the Washington health corps program if they have received a scholarship from programs authorized under this chapter or chapter 70.180 RCW or are ineligible to receive a scholarship if they have received loan repayment authorized under this chapter.

(2) Funds appropriated for the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program, including reasonable administrative costs, may be used by the office for the purposes of loan repayments or scholarships. The office shall annually establish the total amount of funding to be awarded for loan repayments and scholarships and such allocations shall be established based upon the best utilization of funding for that year.

(3) One portion of the funding appropriated for the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program shall be used by the office as a recruitment incentive for communities participating in the community-based recruitment and retention program as authorized by chapter 70.185 RCW; one portion of the funding shall be used by the office as a recruitment incentive for recruitment activities in state-operated institutions, county public health departments and districts, county human service agencies, federal and state contracted community health clinics, and other health care facilities, such as rural hospitals that have been identified by the department, as providing substantial amounts of charity care or publicly subsidized health care; one portion of the funding shall be used by the office for all other awards. The office shall determine the amount of total funding to be distributed between the three portions.

(4) Funds appropriated for the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program, including reasonable administrative costs, may be used by the office for the purposes of loan repayments or scholarships. The office shall annually establish the total amount of funding to be awarded for loan repayments and scholarships and such allocations shall be established based upon the best utilization of funding for that year.

[ 2024 c 369 s 4; 2022 c 276 s 6; 2019 c 302 s 8; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 209; 2003 c 278 s 4; 1991 c 332 s 22; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 720. Formerly RCW 18.150.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—2003 c 278: See note following RCW 28C.18.120.